Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-409.01
Election by mail; procedure.

The directors may choose to hold the annual election required by section 31-409 by sealed mail ballot in accordance with this section. If the option authorized by this section is not exercised by February fifteenth of a given year, the procedure provided by section 31-409 shall be followed.

The secretary of the board shall, at least fifteen days prior to the election, mail to the last-known post office address of each person entitled to vote, a ballot which shall list the names and addresses of the candidates, allow room for write-in votes, and give instructions on how to vote and return the ballot.

Laws 1983, LB 191, § 2.